Utah statutes.
16-6a-1001.   Authority to amend articles of incorporation.
(1)  A nonprofit corporation may amend its articles of incorporation at any
time to:
(a)  add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles
of incorporation; or
(b)  delete a provision not required in the articles of incorporation.
(2)  Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles of
incorporation is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.
